Alabama, session 2026rs, HB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Notwithstanding the provision of Section 155 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, a person who is not over 75
years of age at the beginning time of qualifying for election,
or at the time of his or her appointment, may be elected or
appointed to the Office of Judge of Probate of Walker County.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; and
translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
Page 1

of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
HB208 Enrolled
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Walker County, proposing an amendment to
the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to set the maximum age at
which a person may qualify as judge of probate of the county
to the age of 75 years at the time of qualifying for election
or appointment.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB208 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 21-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 29-Jan-26 Passed



Page 3